apertium-bho.bho.dix
    <pardef n="लेकिन__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="हँस/ल__vblex"> <!--change-->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="m" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ली</l><r>हँसल<s n="vblex"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="एक__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="छोट__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="सुतल__vblex">   <!--change-->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="त__cnjsub">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="लगली__vblex_tv">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="क/र__vblex_tv">
    <e><p><l>र</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>र</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>रता</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>रता रही</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>रता रही</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ईला</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="रहल__vaux_iv">  <!--<pardef n="रह__vaux_iv">-->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e>      <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ई</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="बता__vblex_tv">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>नी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef> 

  <pardef n="आ__vblex_iv">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>वत</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="अनटी__n_f"> <!--जड__n_f-->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="उनती__n_f"> <!--pardef n="नति__n_f"-->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>याँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="काथा__n_f"> <!--pardef n="बला__n_f"-->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ध/ी__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ियाँ</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="हँसल"><i>हँसल</i><par n="हँस/ल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुतल"><i>सुतल</i><par n="सुतल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आप"><i>आप</i><par n="लेकिन__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="त"><i>त</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="आ"><i>आ</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="कर"><i>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगली"><i>लगली</i><par n="लगली__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="रहल"><i>रहल</i><par n="रहल__vaux_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="तक"><i>तक</i><par n="लेकिन__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="अनटी"><i>अनटी</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="उनती"><i>उनती</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="काथा"><i>काथा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="तकले"><i>तकले</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="बाकि"><i>बाकि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="आँखि"><i>आँखि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="काहे"><i>काहे</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रवृत्ति"><i>प्रवृत्ति</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="निकलि"><i>निकलि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="लपकि"><i>लपकि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="काहेंकि"><i>काहेंकि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="कोच्चि"><i>कोच्चि</i><par n="त__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__det"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहे"><i>चाहे</i><par n="लेकिन__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="सेना"><i>सेना</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="प्लान"><i>प्लान</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मदद"><i>मदद</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषा"><i>भाषा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मेहरारू"><i>मेहरारू</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="असफलता"><i>असफलता</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="घोषणा"><i>घोषणा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="घटना"><i>घटना</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तिथि"><i>तिथि</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दल"><i>दल</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तलवार"><i>तलवार</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तोप"><i>तोप</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जगह"><i>जगह</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तिथि"><i>तिथि</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नीति"><i>नीति</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आवभाव"><i>आवभाव</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="समिति"><i>समिति</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="छावनी"><i>छावन</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गढ़ी"><i>गढ़</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रश्नावली"><i>प्रश्नावल</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नदी"><i>नद</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कम्पनी"><i>कम्पन</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पोथी"><i>पोथी</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रान्ति"><i>क्रान्ति</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रात"><i>रात</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पांडुलिपि"><i>पांडुलिपि</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जात"><i>जात</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्था"><i>अवस्था</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्कृति"><i>संस्कृति</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मित्रता"><i>मित्रता</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बतिया"><i>बतिया</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सरकार"><i>सरकार</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मौत"><i>मौत</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाव"><i>भाव</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रीतिरिवाज"><i>रीतिरिवाज</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आशा"><i>आशा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आवश्यकता"><i>आवश्यकता</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हुतात्मा"><i>हुतात्मा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हत्या"><i>हत्या</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पीढ़ी"><i>पीढ़</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सालगिरा"><i>सालगिरा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रोटी"><i>रोट</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तैयारी"><i>तैयार</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="डायरी"><i>डायर</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गोली"><i>गोल</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तिथि"><i>तिथि</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मणि"><i>मणि</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रपट"><i>रपट</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ध्यान"><i>ध्यान</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जेल"><i>जेल</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गऊ"><i>गऊ</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कारागार"><i>कारागार</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="असुर"><i>असुर</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गाड़ी"><i>गाड़</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हथकड़ी"><i>हथकड़</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सूची"><i>सूच</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आर्ट"><i>आर्ट</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दशा"><i>दशा</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सूक्ष्मदर्शी"><i>सूक्ष्मदर्शी</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नाश"><i>नाश</i><par n="उनती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सीख"><i>सीख</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="साँस"><i>साँस</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पार्लामेंट"><i>पार्लामेंट</i><par n="अनटी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाव"><i>भाव</i><par n="काथा__n_f"/></e>
